Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 7
VOTER REGISTRATION DRIVES

1-2-701. Registration of voter registration drive - training - rules.

Before commencing a voter registration drive, a voter registration drive organizer shall file a statement of intent to conduct a voter registration drive with the secretary of state in the manner prescribed by the secretary of state by rules promulgated in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S. The voter registration drive organizer shall designate on the statement the agent of the voter registration drive, who shall be a resident of the state.

A voter registration drive organizer and a voter registration drive circulator shall fulfill the training requirements established by the secretary of state by rules promulgated in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

Prior to circulating any voter registration applications, a person intending to work as a circulator on a voter registration drive shall complete the training provided by the voter registration drive organizer and sign an affirmation affirming that he or she fulfilled the training requirements for circulators.

A voter registration drive organizer shall maintain and make available to the secretary of state records evidencing the training completed by its circulators.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire part added, p. 1396, § 11, effective June 6; entire part added, p. 1431, § 11, effective June 6.

L. 2016:

(2) amended and (3) added, (SB 16-107), ch. 42, p. 102, § 1, effective March 23.

1-2-702. Conducting a voter registration drive.

A voter registration drive organizer shall use the form of the voter registration application approved by the secretary of state by rule.

A circulator working on a voter registration drive shall collect a voter registration application distributed by the voter registration drive and offered by an elector and deliver the application to the voter registration drive organizer. A voter registration drive organizer shall deliver the application to the county clerk and recorder of the county in which the elector resides according to the address indicated on the application. The application shall be delivered no later than fifteen business days after the application is signed, or, if the application is sent by mail, it shall be postmarked no later than fifteen business days after the application is signed; except that an application shall be delivered or mailed no later than the registration deadline set forth in section 1-2-201 (3).

(2.5) Within twenty-two days prior to an election, before accepting for delivery a voter registration application form from any elector, a circulator working on a voter registration drive shall inform the elector that, to vote in the upcoming election, the elector must submit an application for registration at a voter service and polling center or the elector's county clerk and recorder's office or through the online voter registration system established pursuant to section 1-2-202.5.

A voter registration drive organizer shall not compensate a circulator working on the voter registration drive based on the number of voter registration applications the circulator distributes or collects.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire part added, p. 1397, § 11, effective June 6; entire part added, p. 1432, § 11, effective June 6.

L. 2006:

(2) amended, p. 2030, § 7, effective June 6.

L. 2007:

(2) amended, p. 1970, § 7, effective August 3.

L. 2013:

(2) amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 703, § 27, effective May 10.

L. 2016:

(2.5) added, (SB 16-107), ch. 42, p. 102, § 2, effective March 23.

Cross references:

In 2013, subsection (2) was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-2-703. Violations - penalties.

A voter registration drive organizer that conducts a voter registration drive without filing the statement of intent with the secretary of state in accordance with section 1-2-701 or without maintaining a designated agent in the state or that uses a voter registration application form other than the form approved by the secretary of state by rule shall be punished by a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars.

A voter registration drive organizer that fails to fulfill the training requirements established by the secretary of state in accordance with section 1-2-701 (2) shall be punished by a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars.

and

Repealed.

A voter registration drive organizer that intentionally fails to deliver a voter registration application to the proper county clerk and recorder in the manner and time prescribed by section 1-2-702 (2) shall be punished by a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars.

A voter registration drive organizer that compensates a circulator working on a voter registration drive based on the number of voter registration applications the circulator distributes or collects shall be punished by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire part added, p. 1397, § 11, effective June 6; entire part added, p. 1432, § 11, effective June 6.

L. 2006:

(3) amended, p. 2031, § 8, effective June 6.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 1970, § 8, effective August 3.

L. 2012:

(3)(a) and (3)(b) repealed, (HB 12-1292), ch. 181, p. 678, § 8, effective May 17.